Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2777.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 32-900, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE32-900. Definitions In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires: 1. "Advisory letter" means a nondisciplinary letter to notify a licensee or registrant that either: (a) While there is insufficient evidence to support disciplinary action, the board believes that continuation of the activities that led to the investigation may result in further board action against the licensee. (b) The violation is a minor or technical violation that is not of sufficient merit to warrant disciplinary action. (c) The violation is a minor or technical violation, and while the licensee has demonstrated substantial compliance through rehabilitation or remediation that has mitigated the need for disciplinary action, the board believes that repetition of the activities that led to the investigation may result in further board action against the licensee. 2. "Board" means the state board of chiropractic examiners. 3. "Certification" means that a doctor of chiropractic has been certified by the board in a specialty of chiropractic as provided by law. 4. "Chiropractic assistant" means an unlicensed a person who is registered pursuant to this chapter, who has completed an educational training program approved by the board, who assists in basic health care duties in the practice of chiropractic under the supervision of a doctor of chiropractic and who performs delegated duties commensurate with the chiropractic assistant's education and training but who does not evaluate, interpret, design or modify established treatment programs of chiropractic care or violate any statute. 5. "Direct supervision" means that a doctor of chiropractic is WITHin the same room or office suite when a chiropractic assistant or extern is providing clinical services, as delegated, and is available for consultation. 5. 6. "Doctor of chiropractic" or "chiropractor" means a natural person who holds a license to practice chiropractic pursuant to this chapter. 6. 7. "License" means a license to practice chiropractic. 7. 8. "Physical medicine modalities" means any physical agent applied to produce therapeutic change to biologic tissues, including thermal, acoustic, noninvasive light, mechanical or electric energy, hot or cold packs, ultrasound, galvanism, microwave, diathermy and electrical stimulation. 8. 9. "Therapeutic procedures" means the application of clinical skills and services, including therapeutic exercise, therapeutic activities, manual therapy techniques, massage and structural supports, to improve a patient's neuromusculoskeletal condition. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Repeal Section 32-930, Arizona Revised Statutes, is repealed. Sec. 3. Title 32, chapter 8, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section 32-930, to read: START_STATUTE32-930. Chiropractic assistants; registration; renewal; fingerprinting requirement; continuing competence training A. To be registered to practice as a chiropractic assistant, an applicant shall provide the following evidence satisfactory to the board that the applicant: 1. Has completed an application in the manner and form provided by the board. 2. Has paid all applicable fees relative to the registration process as established by the board in rule. 3. Is at least eighteen years of age. 4. Graduated from high school or the equivalent. 5. Completed the board-approved education program. 6. Has taken and passed the Arizona jurisprudence exam with a score of at least seventy-five percent. 7. Beginning January 1, 2027, has a valid fingerprint clearance card issued pursuant to section 41-1758.03. 8. Completed cardiopulmonary resuscitation training as prescribed in rule by the board. B. A chiropractic assistant shall comply with this chapter and the rules adopted pursuant to this chapter. If a chiropractic assistant violates any statute or board rule, the board may impose discipline consistent with this chapter. C. A chiropractic assistant may renew the person's registration in a time and manner established by the board in rule. The board shall establish in rule the annual renewal fee. The renewal period may not exceed two years. D. Registration renewal requires a chiropractic assistant to provide satisfactory evidence to the board of completion of continuing competence training. The board shall determine the number of credit hours, acceptable course content and approved providers for the continuing competence training. E. Registration as a chiropractic assistant is not required for individuals who perform administrative activities of a nonclinical nature. F. A person who is enrolled in an educational program recognized by the board that leads to a diploma or certification as a chiropractic assistant may provide clinical services under the supervision of a doctor of chiropractic to gain the necessary practical clinical experience for the diploma or certification. G. A person may not use the title "chiropractic assistant" or "C.A." or any other designation indicating registered status or hold the person out directly or indirectly as a chiropractic assistant unless the person is registered pursuant to this section.  END_STATUTE Sec. 4. Title 32, chapter 8, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding sections 32-930.01, 32-930.02 and 32-930.03, to read: START_STATUTE32-930.01. Chiropractic assistants; scope of practice; supervision; disclosure A. A chiropractic assistant may perform clinical duties as directed by the supervising chiropractor, including the following: 1. Asepsis and infection control. 2. Taking patient histories and vital signs. 3. Performing first aid and cardiopulmonary resuscitation. 4. Preparing patients for procedures. 5. Assisting the supervising chiropractor with examinations and treatments. 6. Collecting and processing specimens. B. A chiropractic assistant who meets the education requirements for physical medicine modalities and therapeutic procedures pursuant to board rules may administer, under the direct supervision of a doctor of chiropractic who is certified in physical medicine modalities and therapeutic procedures, the following physical medicine modalities and therapeutic procedures: 1. Whirlpool treatments. 2. Diathermy treatments. 3. Electronic galvanization stimulation treatments. 4. Ultrasound therapy. 5. Traction treatments. 6. Transcutaneous nerve stimulation unit treatments. 7. Hot and cold pack treatments. C. A chiropractic assistant who meets the education requirements for acupuncture pursuant to board rules may prepare and sterilize instruments and may remove acupuncture needles under the direct supervision of a doctor of chiropractic who is certified in acupuncture. D. A chiropractic assistant may not do any of the following: 1. Take an x-ray, unless the chiropractic assistant has a valid certificate issued pursuant to chapter 28 of this title authorizing the person to take x-rays. 2. Perform an independent examination of a patient. 3. Diagnose a patient. 4. Determine a regimen of patient care. 5. Change the regimen of patient care set by the supervising chiropractor. 6. Perform an adjustment, manipulation, manual therapy, nutritional instruction, counseling or another therapeutic service or procedure that requires individual licensure in this state. 7. Perform acupuncture by needle insertion. E. A chiropractic assistant may perform only clinical duties that are consistent with a supervising chiropractor's licensure and that are delegated by a supervising chiropractor and only while under the supervision of a doctor of chiropractic who is on the premises while supervising. The supervising chiropractor shall document the clinical duties delegated to a chiropractic assistant in the patient's medical record. F. A supervising chiropractor is responsible for all acts or omissions of the chiropractic assistant the doctor of chiropractic is supervising. G. A chiropractic assistant shall provide appropriate identification to a patient as to the chiropractic assistant's name and clinical classification. A chiropractic assistant shall display a copy of the chiropractic assistant's registration or current renewal card in a location accessible to the public's view at each place of practice. END_STATUTE START_STATUTE32-930.02. Chiropractic assistants; registration by endorsement To register as a chiropractic assistant by endorsement, an applicant shall provide evidence satisfactory to the board that the applicant: 1. Has complied with section 32-930, subsection A. 2. Has current practice privileges in good standing as a registered chiropractic assistant or the equivalent granted by at least one other jurisdiction in the United States whose requirements are substantially similar to or greater than the requirements under this chapter. 3. Has presented to the board current documentation that the practice privileges granted by the other jurisdiction as a registered chiropractic assistant or the equivalent have not been suspended, revoked or otherwise restricted for any reason except nonrenewal. END_STATUTE START_STATUTE32-930.03. Chiropractic assistants; prohibitions A. A person who has had a license to practice chiropractic or any other health care profession suspended, revoked or denied for any reason other than failing to meet education or licensing examination requirements in this or any other jurisdiction may not perform the clinical duties of a chiropractic assistant. B. A person who is licensed to practice chiropractic in this or any other jurisdiction may not be registered as a chiropractic assistant pursuant to this chapter and the rules adopted pursuant to this chapter.END_STATUTE Sec. 5. Section 41-619.51, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE41-619.51. Definitions In this article, unless the context otherwise requires: 1. "Agency" means the supreme court, the department of economic security, the department of child safety, the department of education, the department of health services, the department of juvenile corrections, the department of emergency and military affairs, the department of public safety, the department of transportation, the state real estate department, the department of insurance and financial institutions, the Arizona game and fish department, the Arizona department of agriculture, the board of examiners of nursing care institution administrators and assisted living facility managers, the state board of dental examiners, the Arizona state board of pharmacy, the board of physical therapy, the state board of psychologist examiners, the board of athletic training, the board of occupational therapy examiners, the state board of podiatry examiners, the acupuncture board of examiners, the state board of technical registration, the board of massage therapy, the board of behavioral health examiners, or the Arizona department of housing or the state board of chiropractic examiners. 2. "Board" means the board of fingerprinting. 3. "Central registry exception" means notification to the department of economic security, the department of child safety or the department of health services, as appropriate, pursuant to section 41-619.57 that the person is not disqualified because of a central registry check conducted pursuant to section 8-804. 4. "Expedited review" means an examination, in accordance with board rule, of the documents an applicant submits by the board or its hearing officer without the applicant being present. 5. "Good cause exception" means the issuance of a fingerprint clearance card to an employee pursuant to section 41-619.55. 6. "Person" means a person who is required to be fingerprinted pursuant to this article or who is subject to a central registry check and any of the following: (a) Section 3-314. (b) Section 8-105. (c) Section 8-322. (d) Section 8-463. (e) Section 8-509. (f) Section 8-802. (g) Section 8-804. (h) Section 15-183. (i) Section 15-503. (j) Section 15-512. (k) Section 15-534. (l) Section 15-763.01. (m) Section 15-782.02. (n) Section 15-1330. (o) Section 15-1881. (p) Section 17-215. (q) Section 28-3228. (r) Section 28-3413. (s) Section 32-122.02. (t) Section 32-122.05. (u) Section 32-122.06. (v) Section 32-823. (w) section 32-930. (w) (x) Section 32-1232. (x) (y) Section 32-1276.01. (y) (z) Section 32-1284. (z) (aa) Section 32-1297.01. (aa) (bb) Section 32-1904. (bb) (cc) Section 32-1941. (cc) (dd) Section 32-1982. (dd) (ee) Section 32-2022. (ee) (ff) Section 32-2063. (ff) (gg) Section 32-2108.01. (gg) (hh) Section 32-2123. (hh) (ii) Section 32-2371. (ii) (jj) Section 32-3271. (jj) (kk) Section 32-3430. (kk) (ll) Section 32-3620. (ll) (mm) Section 32-3668. (mm) (nn) Section 32-3669. (nn) (oo) Section 32-3922. (oo) (pp) Section 32-3924. (pp) (qq) Section 32-4128. (qq) (rr) Section 32-4222. (rr) (ss) Section 36-113. (ss) (tt) Section 36-207. (tt) (uu) Section 36-411. (uu) (vv) Section 36-425.03. (vv) (ww) Section 36-446.04. (ww) (xx) Section 36-594.01. (xx) (yy) Section 36-594.02. (yy) (zz) Section 36-766.01. (zz) (aaa) Section 36-882. (aaa) (bbb) Section 36-883.02. (bbb) (ccc) Section 36-897.01. (ccc) (ddd) Section 36-897.03. (ddd) (eee) Section 36-1940. (eee) (fff) Section 36-1940.01. (fff) (ggg) Section 36-2069. (ggg) (hhh) Section 36-3008. (hhh) (iii) Section 41-619.53. (iii) (jjj) Section 41-1964. (jjj) (kkk) Section 41-1967.01. (kkk) (lll) Section 41-1968. (lll) (mmm) Section 41-1969. (mmm) (nnn) Section 41-2814. (nnn) (ooo) Section 41-4025. (ooo) (ppp) Section 46-141, subsection A or B. (ppp) (qqq) Section 46-321.END_STATUTE Sec. 6. Section 41-1758, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE41-1758. Definitions In this article, unless the context otherwise requires: 1. "Agency" means the supreme court, the department of economic security, the department of child safety, the department of education, the department of health services, the department of juvenile corrections, the department of emergency and military affairs, the department of public safety, the department of transportation, the state real estate department, the department of insurance and financial institutions, the board of fingerprinting, the Arizona game and fish department, the Arizona department of agriculture, the board of examiners of nursing care institution administrators and assisted living facility managers, the state board of dental examiners, the Arizona state board of pharmacy, the board of physical therapy, the state board of psychologist examiners, the board of athletic training, the board of occupational therapy examiners, the state board of podiatry examiners, the acupuncture board of examiners, the state board of technical registration, the board of massage therapy, the board of behavioral health examiners, or the Arizona department of housing or the state board of chiropractic examiners. 2. "Division" means the fingerprinting division in the department of public safety. 3. "Electronic or internet-based fingerprinting services" means a secure system for digitizing applicant fingerprints and transmitting the applicant data and fingerprints of a person or entity submitting fingerprints to the department of public safety for any authorized purpose under this title. For the purposes of this paragraph, "secure system" means a system that complies with the information technology security policy approved by the department of public safety. 4. "Good cause exception" means the issuance of a fingerprint clearance card to an applicant pursuant to section 41-619.55. 5. "Person" means a person who is required to be fingerprinted pursuant to any of the following: (a) Section 3-314. (b) Section 8-105. (c) Section 8-322. (d) Section 8-463. (e) Section 8-509. (f) Section 8-802. (g) Section 15-183. (h) Section 15-503. (i) Section 15-512. (j) Section 15-534. (k) Section 15-763.01. (l) Section 15-782.02. (m) Section 15-1330. (n) Section 15-1881. (o) Section 17-215. (p) Section 28-3228. (q) Section 28-3413. (r) Section 32-122.02. (s) Section 32-122.05. (t) Section 32-122.06. (u) Section 32-823. (v) Section 32-930. (v) (w) Section 32-1232. (w) (x) Section 32-1276.01. (x) (y) Section 32-1284. (y) (z) Section 32-1297.01. (z) (aa) Section 32-1904. (aa) (bb) Section 32-1941. (bb) (cc) Section 32-1982. (cc) (dd) Section 32-2022. (dd) (ee) Section 32-2063. (ee) (ff) Section 32-2108.01. (ff) (gg) Section 32-2123. (gg) (hh) Section 32-2371. (hh) (ii) Section 32-3271. (ii) (jj) Section 32-3430. (jj) (kk) Section 32-3620. (kk) (ll) Section 32-3668. (ll) (mm) Section 32-3669. (mm) (nn) Section 32-3922. (nn) (oo) Section 32-3924. (oo) (pp) Section 32-4128. (pp) (qq) Section 32-4222. (qq) (rr) Section 36-113. (rr) (ss) Section 36-207. (ss) (tt) Section 36-411. (tt) (uu) Section 36-425.03. (uu) (vv) Section 36-446.04. (vv) (ww) Section 36-594.01. (ww) (xx) Section 36-594.02. (xx) (yy) Section 36-766.01. (yy) (zz) Section 36-882. (zz) (aaa) Section 36-883.02. (aaa) (bbb) Section 36-897.01. (bbb) (ccc) Section 36-897.03. (ccc) (ddd) Section 36-1940. (ddd) (eee) Section 36-1940.01. (eee) (fff) Section 36-2069. (fff) (ggg) Section 36-3008. (ggg) (hhh) Section 41-619.52. (hhh) (iii) Section 41-619.53. (iii) (jjj) Section 41-1964. (jjj) (kkk) Section 41-1967.01. (kkk) (lll) Section 41-1968. (lll) (mmm) Section 41-1969. (mmm) (nnn) Section 41-2814. (nnn) (ooo) Section 41-4025. (ooo) (ppp) Section 46-141, subsection A or B. (ppp) (qqq) Section 46-321. 6. "Rap back services" has the same meaning prescribed in section 41-1750. 7. "Vulnerable adult" has the same meaning prescribed in section 13-3623. END_STATUTE Sec. 7. Section 41-1758.01, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE41-1758.01. Fingerprinting division; powers and duties A. The fingerprinting division is established in the department of public safety and shall: 1. Conduct fingerprint background checks for persons and applicants who are seeking licenses from state agencies, employment with licensees, contract providers and state agencies or employment or educational opportunities with agencies that require fingerprint background checks pursuant to sections 3-314, 8-105, 8-322, 8-463, 8-509, 8-802, 15-183, 15-503, 15-512, 15-534, 15-763.01, 15-782.02, 15-1330, 15-1881, 17-215, 28-3228, 28-3413, 32-122.02, 32-122.05, 32-122.06, 32-823, 32-930, 32-1232, 32-1276.01, 32-1284, 32-1297.01, 32-1904, 32-1941, 32-1982, 32-2022, 32-2063, 32-2108.01, 32-2123, 32-2371, 32-3271, 32-3430, 32-3620, 32-3668, 32-3669, 32-3922, 32-3924, 32-4128, 32-4222, 36-113, 36-207, 36-411, 36-425.03, 36-446.04, 36-594.01, 36-594.02, 36-766.01, 36-882, 36-883.02, 36-897.01, 36-897.03, 36-1940, 36-1940.01, 36-2069, 36-3008, 41-619.52, 41-619.53, 41-1964, 41-1967.01, 41-1968, 41-1969, 41-2814 and 41-4025, section 46-141, subsection A or B and section 46-321. 2. Issue fingerprint clearance cards. On issuance, a fingerprint clearance card becomes the personal property of the cardholder and the cardholder shall retain possession of the fingerprint clearance card. 3. On submission of an application for a fingerprint clearance card, collect the fees established by the board of fingerprinting pursuant to section 41-619.53 and deposit, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, the monies collected in the board of fingerprinting fund. 4. Inform in writing each person who submits fingerprints for a fingerprint background check of the right to petition the board of fingerprinting for a good cause exception pursuant to section 41-1758.03, 41-1758.04 or 41-1758.07. 5. If after conducting a state and federal criminal history records check the division determines that it is not authorized to issue a fingerprint clearance card to a person, inform the person in writing that the division is not authorized to issue a fingerprint clearance card. The notice shall include the criminal history information on which the denial was based. This criminal history information is subject to dissemination restrictions pursuant to section 41-1750 and Public Law 92-544. 6. Notify the person in writing if the division suspends, revokes or places a driving restriction notation on a fingerprint clearance card pursuant to section 41-1758.04. The notice shall include the criminal history information on which the suspension, revocation or placement of the driving restriction notation was based. This criminal history information is subject to dissemination restrictions pursuant to section 41-1750 and Public Law 92-544. 7. Administer and enforce this article. B. The fingerprinting division may contract for electronic or internet-based fingerprinting services through an entity or entities for the acquisition and transmission of applicant fingerprint and data submissions to the department, including identity verified fingerprints pursuant to section 15-106. The entity or entities contracted by the department of public safety may charge the applicant a fee for services provided pursuant to this article. The entity or entities contracted by the department of public safety shall comply with: 1. All information privacy and security measures and submission standards established by the department of public safety. 2. The information technology security policy approved by the department of public safety. END_STATUTE